Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB133.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 229.011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Advertise" means the use of handbills, placards, posters, billboards, pictures, printed or written material or
newspapers or other publications, or radio, television, Internet, and other communication media;
(2) "Boxing" means a contest or exhibition in which a person delivers blows with the fist that may be reasonably
expected to disable or inflict injury and in which boxers compete for money, a prize, or other pecuniary gain,
or for which admission is charged to spectators;
(3) "Commission" means the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission;
(4) "Exhibition" means an event or engagement:
(a) In which the participants show or display their skills without necessarily striving to win;[ or]
(b) That involves amateurs not under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky High School Athletic Association,
the National Collegiate Athletic Association, the National Association of Intercollegiate Athletics, the
Amateur Athletic Union, Golden Gloves, USA Boxing, or USA Wrestling[, or a public show to which
an admission ticket is required, or other charge is made, or invitation]; or
(c) That involves a public show in which an admission ticket is required, or other charge is made, that is
not sanctioned by one (1) of the sanctioning bodies listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(5) "Kickboxing" means a boxing contest or exhibition where the participants are allowed to throw kicks or foot
blows at the opponent in addition to punching with the hands and in which kickboxers compete for money, a
prize, or other pecuniary gain, or for which admission is charged to spectators;
(6) "Mixed martial arts" means any form of unarmed contest or exhibition in which participants compete for
money, a prize, or other pecuniary gain, or for which admission is charged to spectators. Mixed martial arts
may include any element or combination of elements of boxing, kickboxing, wrestling, or other martial arts.
Exhibitions where participants are judged on form and style and where punches and kicks are pulled shall not
be included in this definition;
(7) "Muay thai" means a boxing contest or exhibition where the participants are allowed combined use of
clinches, elbows, knees, and shins in addition to punching with the hands and in which participants compete
for money, a prize, or other pecuniary gain, or for which admission is charged to spectators;
(8) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or club;
(9) "Show" means any boxing, kickboxing, mixed martial arts, muay thai, or wrestling match, contest, or
exhibition coming under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission;
(10) "Unarmed combat" means boxing, kickboxing, sparring, wrestling, mixed martial arts, or muay thai under the
jurisdiction of the commission; and
(11) "Wrestling" means an activity or performance of athletic and wrestling skill between individuals who are not
under the jurisdiction of the Kentucky High School Athletic Association, the National Collegiate Athletic
Association, the National Association of Intercollegiate Athletics, or USA Wrestling in which the participants
struggle hand-to-hand primarily for the purpose of providing entertainment to spectators rather than
conducting a bona fide athletic contest. The outcome of these matches may be predetermined. Participating
wrestlers may not be required to use their best efforts in order to win.
Section 2. KRS 229.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) USA Boxing is the only sanctioning body recognized to conduct combat sports not covered under this chapter.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) All other sanctioning bodies shall be nonprofit and submit a request to the commission to be recognized as a
sanctioning body according to the requirements the commission establishes through the promulgation of an
administrative regulation.
(3) Sanctioning bodies shall provide notice to the commission of all combat sports exhibitions not otherwise
covered under this chapter for publication in a calendar of events according to the requirements the
commission establishes through the promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.